District of Columbia statutes.
49-602

Dishonorable discharge.

An enlisted man shall be dishonorably discharged by order of the Commanding General upon conviction of felony in a civil court; upon discovery of reenlistment after previous dishonorable discharge; or to carry out a sentence of a court-martial.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 775, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 632, ch. 146, § 27
1981 Ed., § 39-502.
1973 Ed., § 39-405.